Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-10,139.06
Department; study; report.

(1) The department shall study the efficacy of the Hunger-Free Schools Pilot Program and the impact on academic and behavioral performance of students involved in the program. The study shall:

(a) Examine the performance of students attending participating schools;

(b) Include data beginning with school year 2026-27 and ending with school year 2031-32; and

(c) Be conducted in a manner that protects the identity of students and complies with state and federal privacy laws.

(2) On or before December 1, 2032, the department shall electronically report the results to the Clerk of the Legislature and to the Education Committee of the Legislature.

Laws 2026, LB966, § 6.
July 18, 2026